Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1557.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 57A02 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 57A02. Enforcement officer disability benefits.(a) [General rule] Compensation.--A person covered under section 1(a) of the act of June 28, 1935 (P.L.477, No.193), referred to as the Enforcement Officer Disability Benefits Law, who, during the duration of a declaration of a disaster emergency for COVID-19 declared by the Governor, contracts or is diagnosed with [coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19), as identified in the proclamation of disaster emergency issued by the Governor on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020),] COVID-19 or is subject to quarantine resulting from exposure to COVID-19, and by reason thereof is temporarily 12345678910111213141516171819 incapacitated from performing his duties, shall be compensated in accordance with section 1(a) of the Enforcement Officer Disability Benefits Law.(b) Limitation.--A benefit received under subsection (a) shall be limited to 60 days for each incident.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"COVID-19." The coronavirus disease 2019, being an infectious disease caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 that was first identified during December 2019 in Wuhan, China.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1557PN1841 - 2 - 12345678910111213